Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 5

Membership in Federal Reserve Banks

45-2-501. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Federal Reserve Act” includes the act of congress of the United States approved December 23, 1913, as amended;

“Federal reserve bank” means the federal reserve banks created and organized under the authority of the Federal Reserve Act;

“Federal reserve board” means the federal reserve board, created and described in the Federal Reserve Act; and

“Member bank” means any national bank, state bank, or banking and trust company that has become or that becomes a member of one (1) of the federal reserve banks created by the Federal Reserve Act.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.323); T.C.A., § 45-301.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Reserve Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 12 U.S.C.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-2-502. Power to subscribe to stock.

Any state bank has the power to subscribe to the capital stock and become a member of a federal reserve bank.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.323); T.C.A., § 45-302.

45-2-503. Powers of federal reserve bank membership.

A state bank that is or that becomes a member of a federal reserve bank is by this part vested with all powers conferred upon member banks of the federal reserve banks by the terms of the Federal Reserve Act as fully and completely as if the powers were here specifically enumerated and described, and all the powers shall be exercised, subject to all restrictions and limitations imposed by the Federal Reserve Act, or by regulations of the federal reserve board made pursuant to the act. The right, however, is expressly reserved to revoke or to amend the powers herein conferred.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.323); T.C.A., § 45-303.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Reserve Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 12 U.S.C.

45-2-504. Reserves of Federal Reserve Act sufficient.

A compliance on the part of a bank with the reserve requirements of the Federal Reserve Act shall be held to be a full compliance with those laws of this state that require banks to maintain reserves, and the bank shall not be required to carry or maintain reserves other than those required under the terms of the Federal Reserve Act.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.323); T.C.A., § 45-304.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Reserve Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 12 U.S.C.

45-2-505. Supervision and examinations — Disclosures to federal reserve board.

The bank shall continue to be subject to the supervision and examinations required by the laws of this state, except that the federal reserve board shall have the right, if it deems necessary, to make examinations, and the authorities of this state having supervision over the bank or trust company may disclose to the federal reserve board, or to examiners duly appointed by it, all information in reference to the affairs of any bank that has become, or desires to become, a member of a federal reserve bank.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.323); T.C.A., § 45-305.